en: ISO 22000:2018
xx: ISO 22000:2018

en: ISO 22000-2007
xx: ISO 22000-2007
ru: ГОСТ Р ИСО 22000-2007

en: ISO 22005
xx: ISO 22005

en: ISO 22005:2007
xx: ISO 22005:2007

en: ISO 22716
xx: ISO 22716

en: ISO 45001
xx: ISO 45001

en: ISO 50001
xx: ISO 50001

en: ISO 50001-2011
xx: ISO 50001-2011

en: Designated Origin Denomination
de: Ausgewiesene Herkunftsbezeichnung
es: DO, D.O., Denominación de Origen
fi: alkuperänimitys
fr: Appellation d'origine
it: Denominazione di Origine Designata
pt: Denominação de Origem

es: DOCa, D.O.Ca., Denominación de Origen Calificada
ru: Обозначение происхождения

en: EAC
xx: EAC

en: Fair trade
xx: Fair trade
af: regverdige handel
ar: تجارة عادلة
bg: Справедлива търговия
bn: ন্যায্য বাণিজ্য
ca: Comerç Just
cy: masnach deg
da: Bæredygtig handel
de: Fairer Handel
el: Δίκαιο εμπόριο
eo: justa komerco
es: Comercio justo, Fairtrade-Comercio Justo
et: õiglane kaubandus
eu: Bidezko merkataritza
fa: تجارت منصفانه
fi: Reilu kauppa
fr: Commerce équitable, équitable, issu du commerce équitable, issus du commerce équitable, issue du commerce équitable, issues du commerce équitable, ingrédients issus du commerce équitable, produits issus du commerce équitable, ingrédient issu du commerce équitable, Ingrédients conformes aux standards du commerce équitable Fairtrade/Max Havelaar, ingrédients conformes aux standards du commerce équitable, 100% du total des ingrédients d'origine agricole sont conformes aux standards du commerce équitable
ga: trádáil chóir
gl: Comercio xusto
he: סחר הוגן
hr: Pravedna trgovina
hu: Méltányos kereskedelem, becsületes kereskedelem
hy: Արդար արևտուր
id: Perdagangan adil
ig: ahia ziri ezi
io: Equitatoza komerco
is: Sanngjörn viðskipti
it: Commercio equo, commercio equo e solidale
ja: 公正取引
kk: Әділ сауда
ko: 공정 무역
lt: Sąžininga prekyba
mk: праведна трговија
ml: ന്യായവ്യാപാരം
ms: Perdagangan adil
nb: rettferdig handel
nl: Eerlijke handel, Fairtrade, Rechtvaardige handel
nn: rettferdig handel
pl: sprawiedliwy handel
pt: Comércio justo
ro: comerț echitabil
ru: Справедливая торговля
sh: Pravedna trgovina
sk: Fair Trade
sl: pravična trgovina
sr: праведна трговина
sv: rättvis handel, Fairtradecertifierad
ta: நியாய வணிகம்
th: การค้าโดยชอบธรรม
tl: Patas na kalakalan
tr: Adil ticaret
uk: справедлива торгівля
vi: Thương mại công bằng
wa: Comiece å droet pris
zh: 公平貿易

en: Non-fair trade, Not fair trade
fr: Non issu du commerce équitable

en: World Fair Trade Organization, WFTO
xx: World Fair Trade Organization, WFTO

en: Fairtrade International, Fairtrade, FLO international, FLO
xx: Fairtrade International, Fairtrade, FLO international, FLO
bg: Fairtrade International, Fairtrade
ca: Fairtrade Internacional, FLO International
it: Commercio Equo Internazionale
ru: Честная торговля

en: Fairtrade USA, Fairtrade America
xx: Fairtrade USA

en: Fairtrade Australia and New Zealand
it: Fairtrade Australia e Nuova Zelanda

de: Fairtrade Österreich
xx: Fairtrade Austria

en: Fairtrade Belgium
it: Fairtrade Belgio

en: Fairtrade Canada
xx: Fairtrade Canada